Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-305
State hospitals for the mentally ill; official titles.

The state hospital established in Lancaster County for the treatment of mental illnesses shall be known as the Lincoln Regional Center. The state hospital established in Madison County shall be known as the Norfolk Regional Center. The state hospital established in Adams County shall be known as the Hastings Regional Center.

Laws 1921, c. 162, § 1, p. 656;

C.S.1922, § 6950;

C.S.1929, § 83-755;

Laws 1935, c. 185, § 3, p. 686;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 83-755;

R.S.1943, § 83-305;

Laws 1953, c. 345, § 1, p. 1120;

Laws 1969, c. 818, § 11, p. 3119;

Laws 1973, LB 536, § 4;

Laws 1975, LB 466, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 85;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 129.

Convicted sex offenders, evaluation and treatment, see section 29-2925 et seq.

Mentally ill veterans, care and treatment of, see sections 80-601 to 80-606.

Mentally incompetent persons:

Becoming incompetent after commission of crime, procedure, see section 29-1822.

Insanity as defense in criminal cases, procedure, see section 29-2203.

State institutions, official names, see section 83-107.01.

All hospitals for the insane of the state are governed by same general provisions. State v. Gage County, 100 Neb. 753, 161 N.W. 267 (1917).